Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1928
Foreclosure of tax lien by county under old law; sale of property; proceeds; disposition.

From the proceeds of the sales of said pieces of property, or any sales which may have heretofore been had, there shall first be paid the costs of sale, the court costs, including any attorney's fees paid or to be paid on account of said foreclosure, any reasonable expense in taking care of the property and all costs for advertising for delinquent taxes. The balance, if any, shall be distributed to the governmental bodies in the following manner: By paying the taxes which shall have been unpaid by the previous owners, with interest and penalties, in the inverse order assessed, to the extent of the proceeds, and any unpaid taxes thereafter remaining shall be canceled on the books of the county.

Laws 1943, c. 184, § 6, p. 634;

R.S.1943, § 77-1928.